Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2911
Restorative justice programs and dispute resolution; types of cases; referral of cases.

(1) The following types of cases may be accepted for restorative justice programs and dispute resolution at an approved center:

(a) Civil claims and disputes, including, but not limited to, consumer and commercial complaints, disputes between neighbors, disputes between business associates, disputes between landlords and tenants, and disputes within communities;

(b) Disputes concerning child custody, parenting time, visitation, or other access and other areas of domestic relations;

(c) Juvenile offenses and disputes involving juveniles when appropriate, which shall be determined according to the policies and procedures provided for in section 25-2918;

(d) Disputes involving youth that occur in families, in educational settings, and in the community at large;

(e) Adult criminal offenses and disputes involving juvenile, adult, or community victims when appropriate, which shall be determined according to the policies and procedures provided for in section 25-2918; and

(f) Contested guardianship and contested conservatorship proceedings.

(2) Restorative justice practices at an approved center may be used in addition to any other condition, consequence, or sentence imposed by a court, a probation officer, a diversion program, a school, or another community program.

(3) An approved center may accept cases referred by a court, an attorney, a law enforcement officer, a social service agency, a school, or any other interested person or agency or upon the request of the parties involved. A case may be referred prior to the commencement of formal judicial proceedings or may be referred as a pending court case. If a court refers a case to an approved center, the center shall provide information to the court as to whether an agreement was reached. If the court requests a copy of the agreement, the center shall provide it.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB554, § 25;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 9.